West Virginia, session 2025, SB358.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 8. Authorization for Department of Transportation to promulgate legislative rules. §64-8-1. Division of Highways. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 27, 2024, authorized under the authority of §17-2A-8 of this code, modified by the Division of Highways to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 11, 2024, relating to the Division of Highways (construction and reconstruction of state roads, 157 CSR 03), is authorized.The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 9, 2024, authorized under the authority of §17-2A-8 of this code, relating to the Division of Highways (use of state rights-of-way and adjacent areas, 157 CSR 06), is authorized.The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 23, 2024, authorized under the authority of §22-18-7 of this code, relating to the Division of Highways (transportation of hazardous wastes upon the roads and highways, 157 CSR 07), is authorized.The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 23, 2024, authorized under the authority of §31H-2-3 of this code, relating to the Division of Highways (small wireless facilities on Division of Highways rights-of-way, 157 CSR 13), is authorized. §64-8-2. Division of Motor Vehicles. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 14, 2024, authorized under the authority of §17A-2-9 of this code, modified by the Division of Motor Vehicles to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 2, 2024, relating to the Division of Motor Vehicles (denial, suspension, revocation, disqualification, restriction, non-renewal, cancellation, administrative appeals, and reinstatement of driving privileges, 91 CSR 05), is authorized with the following amendment: On page 6, after subsection 6.4. by adding a new subsection 6.5. to read as follows: 6.5. Credit for revocation/suspension served: In the event that a state or jurisdiction neglects to provide a conviction to West Virginia within a sufficient time to assess a revocation or suspension period required by this state concurrently with the revocation or suspension period assessed by the state or jurisdiction where the offense occurred and upon the request of a non-commercial license holder, the Division, after confirming the proof submitted by the driver, may provide credit for any license revocation or suspension period served that was imposed by the state or jurisdiction where the offense occurred in order to satisfy all or a portion of a revocation or suspension period required by this State for a West Virginia non-commercial drivers license holder, unless prohibited by federal law. Evidence that a person requesting relief under this provision drove during the period for which credit is sought shall be treated as if the person drove while the license was suspended or revoked by this State. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 14, 2024, authorized under the authority of §17D-2-2 of this code, modified by the Division of Motor Vehicles to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 4, 2024, relating to the Division of Motor Vehicles (disclosure of information from the files of the Division of Motor Vehicles, 91 CSR 08), is authorized. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 14, 2024, authorized under the authority of §17C-13-6 of this code, modified by the Division of Motor Vehicles to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 2, 2024, relating to the Division of Motor Vehicles (handicapped placards, 91 CSR 10), is authorized. (d) The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 14, 2024, authorized under the authority of §17C-5A-3 of this code, relating to the Division of Motor Vehicles (Safety and Treatment Program, 91 CSR 15), is authorized.(e) The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 14, 2024, authorized under the authority of §17A-3-25 of this code, relating to the Division of Motor Vehicles (State Vehicle Title, Registration and Relicensing Project of 2018, 91 CSR 24), is authorized. §64-8-3. Parkways Authority. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 31, 2024, authorized under the authority of §17-16D-14 of this code, modified by the Parkways Authority to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 11, 2024, relating to the Parkways Authority (supporting electronic toll collection and enforcement, 184 CSR 05), is authorized.The Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the Senate  		............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates				                  Originated in the Senate. In effect from passage.    				............................................................... President of the Senate  						............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2025.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home